Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-14] Summary orders and supervision. (a)
Whenever the commissioner determines that the financial condition of any dental
insurer is such that its continued operation might be hazardous to its
enrollees, creditors, or the general public, or that it has violated any
provision of this chapter, the commissioner, after notice and hearing, may
order the dental insurer to take such action as may be reasonably necessary to
rectify such condition or violation, including but not limited to:

(1) Reducing the total amount of present and
potential liability for benefits by reinsurance or other method acceptable to
the commissioner;

(2) Reducing the volume of new business being
accepted;

(3) Reducing expenses by specified methods;

(4) Suspending or limiting the writing of new
business for a period of time;

(5) Increasing the dental insurer's capital and
surplus by contribution; or

(6) Taking any other steps as the commissioner may
deem appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) For purposes of this section, the
violation by a dental insurer of any law of this State to which the dental
insurer is subject shall be deemed a violation of this chapter.

(c) The commissioner is authorized to set
uniform standards and criteria for early warning that the continued operation
of any dental insurer might be hazardous to its enrollees, creditors, or the
general public, and to set standards for evaluating the financial condition of
any dental insurer, which standards shall be consistent with the purposes
expressed in subsection (a).

(d) The remedies and measures available to the
commissioner under this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of,
the remedies and measures available to the commissioner under the provisions of
article 15 of chapter 431. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next